en: Papier Mache Mixes
xx: Papier Mache Mixes
cs: Směsi na kašírování
da: Papmachéblandinger
de: Pappmaschee-Mischungen
es: Mezclas para papel maché
fr: Mélanges de papier mâché
it: Mix per cartapesta
ja: 混凝紙材料
nl: Papier-machémengsels
no: Pappmasjéblandinger
pl: Mieszanki masy papierowej
pt: Misturas para papel machê
ru: Основа для папье-маше
sv: Papier-maché-blandningar
tr: Kağıt Hamuru Karışımları

en: Plaster Gauze
xx: Plaster Gauze
cs: Sádrová gáza
da: Gips
de: Gipsgewebe
es: Gasa de yeso
fr: Bande de plâtre
it: Garza di gesso
ja: 石膏ガーゼ
nl: Gipsgaas
no: Gips
pl: Gaza do modelowania
pt: Gaze com gesso
ru: Гипсовая ткань
sv: Gipsgasväv
tr: Alçı Sargı Bezi

en: Pottery Slips
xx: Pottery Slips
cs: Engoby na keramiku
da: Begitning af keramik
de: Engoben
es: Engobes
fr: Barbotines pour poterie
it: Materiali per decorare la porcellana
ja: 陶芸用泥漿
nl: Engobes
no: Keramikkremser
pl: Szlikiery
pt: Pedaços de cerâmica
ru: Шликер
sv: Färgad lera för ytbehandling
tr: Çömlek Çamurları

en: Raw Candle Wax
xx: Raw Candle Wax
cs: Vosk na výrobu svíček
da: Uforarbejdet voks til fremstilling af lys
de: Rohes Kerzenwachs
es: Cera virgen para velas
fr: Cire brute
it: Cera grezza per candele
ja: キャンドル用ワックス
nl: Ruwe kaarsenwas
no: Stearinlysvoks
pl: Surowy wosk na świece
pt: Ceras naturais para vela
ru: Воск для свечей
sv: Råvax
tr: Ham Parafin Mumu

en: Textiles
xx: Textiles
cs: Textilie
da: Tekstiler
de: Textilien
es: Tejidos
fr: Textiles
it: Tessili
ja: 布地
nl: Textiel
no: Tekstiler
pl: Tekstylia
pt: Tecidos
ru: Текстиль
sv: Textilier
tr: Tekstil

en: Crafting Canvas
xx: Crafting Canvas
cs: Hobby plátna
da: Kanvas til håndarbejde
de: Bastelleinwände
es: Lienzos para manualidades
fr: Toiles pour loisirs créatifs
it: Tele per attività creative
ja: クラフト用キャンバス
nl: Handwerkcanvas
no: Lerret
pl: Płótna artystyczne
pt: Telas para artesanato
ru: Холст для рукоделия
sv: Hobbyduk
tr: El İşi Bezi

en: Needlecraft Canvas
xx: Needlecraft Canvas
cs: Vyšívací plátna
da: Kanvas til syning
de: Stickleinwände
es: Telas para bordados
fr: Toiles pour travaux d'aiguille
it: Tela aida per punto croce
ja: 刺繍用キャンバス
nl: Borduurlinnen
no: Broderibilder
pl: Płótno do haftu na kanwie
pt: Telas para bordado
ru: Холст для вышивки
sv: Handarbetsduk
tr: İğne İşi Bezi

en: Painting Canvas
xx: Painting Canvas
cs: Plátna a kartony
da: Lærreder og plader
de: Leinwände & Keilrahmen
es: Lienzos para pintar
fr: Toiles à peindre
it: Tele da pittura
ja: キャンバス・ボード
nl: Schildersdoeken en canvasboards
no: Malelerreter
pl: Kanwy i tablice malarskie
pt: Telas para pintura
ru: Холсты и доски
sv: Målardukar och målarplattor
tr: Tuvaller

en: Plastic Canvas
xx: Plastic Canvas
cs: Plastová kanava
da: Plastiklærred
de: Plastiksegeltuch
es: Lienzo de plástico
fr: Canevas en plastique
it: Plastic canvas
ja: プラスチックキャンバス
nl: Kunststofcanvas
no: Plastlerret
pl: Kanwy plastikowe
pt: Telas de plástico
ru: Пластиковая канва
sv: Plastduk
tr: Sentetik Dokuma

en: Fabric
xx: Fabric
cs: Látky
da: Stof
de: Stoffe
es: Telas
fr: Tissu
it: Stoffa
ja: 布・生地
nl: Stof
no: Stoff
pl: Tkaniny
pt: Tecido
ru: Ткани
sv: Tyg
tr: Kumaşlar

en: Interfacing
xx: Interfacing
cs: Oděvní vložky
da: Forstærkning
de: Vlieseline
es: Interfaces
fr: Entoilage
it: Fodere
ja: 芯地
nl: Vlieseline
no: Foring
pl: Flizelina
pt: Entretelas
ru: Флизелин
sv: Vlieseline
tr: Tela

en: Printable Fabric
xx: Printable Fabric
cs: Textilie k potisku
da: Stof til printere
de: Bedruckbare Gewebe
es: Tejido imprimible
fr: Tissu imprimable
it: Tessuto da stampare
ja: 印刷用布
nl: Bedrukbare stoffen
no: Stoff til trykk
pl: Tkaniny do nadruków
pt: Telas imprimíveis
ru: Ткань для печати рисунка
sv: Tyg för tryck
tr: Baskılık Kumaş

en: Wick Tabs
xx: Wick Tabs
cs: Plíšky do svíček
da: Vægeholdere til stearinlys
de: Dochthalter
es: Portamechas
fr: Socles pour mèches
it: Base per stoppini
ja: キャンドル芯用座金
nl: Lonthouders
no: Vekeholdere
pl: Blaszki do knotów
pt: Discos de metal para confecção de velas
ru: Вкладки для фитилей
sv: Vekeshållare
tr: Fitil Kulakçıkları

en: Wicks
xx: Wicks
cs: Knoty
da: Væger
de: Dochte
es: Mechas
fr: Mèches
it: Stoppini
ja: キャンドル芯糸
nl: Lonten
no: Veker
pl: Knoty
pt: Pavios
ru: Фитили
sv: Vekar
tr: Kulakçıklar

en: Art & Crafting Tool Accessories
xx: Art & Crafting Tool Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k hobby pomůckám
da: Tilbehør til værktøjer til håndarbejde
de: Zubehör für Kunst- & Bastelwerkzeuge
es: Accesorios para herramientas de manualidades
fr: Accessoires d'outils pour loisirs créatifs
it: Accessori da strumenti per hobby e artigianato
ja: アート・クラフト関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor kunst- en hobbygereedschap
no: Tilbehør til kunst- og håndverksverktøy
pl: Akcesoria do narzędzi dla artystów i rękodzielników
pt: Acessórios para ferramentas de artesanato e de arte
ru: Принадлежности для инструментов для рукоделия и хобби
sv: Tillbehör till konst- och hobbyverktyg
tr: Sanat ve El İşi Araç Aksesuarları

en: Craft Knife Blades
xx: Craft Knife Blades
cs: Čepele do odlamovacích nožů
da: Blade til hobbykniv
de: Klingen für Bastelmesser
es: Hojas de cúter para manualidades
fr: Lames de rechange pour couteaux
it: Lame per taglierine
ja: クラフトナイフ替刃
nl: Bladen voor precisiemessen
no: Blader til hobbykniver
pl: Noże do papieru i ostrza
pt: Lâminas para estilete de precisão
ru: Лезвия для канцелярских ножей
sv: Hobbyknivblad
tr: Maket Bıçağı Uçları

en: Craft Machine Cases & Covers
xx: Craft Machine Cases & Covers
cs: Pouzdra a kryty na šicí stroje
da: Symaskine – kasser og covers
de: Nähmaschinengehäuse & -abdeckungen
es: Fundas y maletines para máquinas de coser
fr: Housses et protections pour machines de loisirs créatifs
it: Valigette e coperture per macchine da cucire
ja: ミシンケース
nl: Naaimachinehoezen
no: Kasser og deksler til håndverksmaskiner
pl: Futerały i osłony na maszyny do szycia
pt: Estojos e capas para máquinas de artesanato
ru: Футляры и чехлы для швейных машин
sv: Skydd och fodral för handarbetsmaskiner
tr: Dikiş Makinesi Kılıfları ve Örtüleri

en: Sewing Machine Extension Tables
xx: Sewing Machine Extension Tables
cs: Rozšiřující stolky k šicímu stroji
da: Borde til symaskiner
de: Verlängerungstische für Nähmaschinen
es: Mesas de extensión para máquinas de coser
fr: Tables d'extension pour machines à coudre
it: Tavoli prolunga per macchine da cucire
ja: ミシン用伸縮テーブル
nl: Verlengtafels voor naaimachines
no: Forlengerbord til symaskiner
pl: Dodatkowe blaty do maszyn do szycia
pt: Mesas extensoras para máquinas de costura
ru: Раздвижные столы для швейных машин
sv: Förlängningsbord till symaskin
tr: Dikiş Makinesi Uzatma Masaları

en: Sewing Machine Feet
xx: Sewing Machine Feet
cs: Patky pro šicí stroje
da: Symaskine – fødder
de: Nähmaschinenfüße
es: Pies para máquinas de coser
fr: Surjeteuses pour machines à coudre
it: Piedini macchina da cucire
ja: ミシン押さえ
nl: Voetpedalen voor naaimachine
no: Føtter til symaskiner
pl: Pedały do maszyn do szycia
pt: Sapatas para máquina de costurar
ru: Лапки для швейных машин
sv: Symaskinsfötter
tr: Dikiş Makinesi Ayakları

en: Sewing Machine Replacement Parts
xx: Sewing Machine Replacement Parts
cs: Náhradní díly k šicím strojům
da: Reservedele til symaskiner
de: Ersatzteile für Nähmaschinen
es: Piezas de repuesto para máquinas de coser
fr: Pièces de rechange pour machines à coudre
it: Ricambi per macchine da cucire
ja: ミシン用交換部品
nl: Vervangingsonderdelen voor naaimachines
no: Reservedeler til symaskiner
pl: Części zamienne do maszyn do szycia
pt: Peças para máquinas de costura
ru: Запасные детали для швейных машин
sv: Reservdelar till symaskin
tr: Dikiş Makinesi Yedek Parçaları